Hawaii statutes.
§281-14 Records. The liquor commission
and liquor control adjudication board shall ensure that complete records are
kept of all commission and board meetings, proceedings, and acts with reference
to all business pertaining to licenses issued, suspended, and revoked, moneys
received as license fees and otherwise, and disbursements by the commission or
board or under its authority. Unless otherwise prohibited by law, these
records shall be open for examination by the public. The records may be
destroyed as provided in section 46-43. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §6; RL 1935, §2575;
am L Sp 1941, c 89, §1(a); RL 1945, §7226; RL 1955, §159-13; HRS §281-14; am L
1976, c 55, §1; am L 1990, c 171, §5; am L 1998, c 249, §6]

Cross References

Meetings and records of public agencies, requirements
concerning, see chapter 92.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next